California statutes. Public Resources Code
The commission may act in behalf of the State of California pursuant to Section 7 of the Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act, an Act of Congress approved by the President on August 7, 1953 (67 Stat. 462, 43 U.S.C. Section 1336), and negotiate, with the concurrence of the Attorney General of California, with the Secretary of the Interior and with the Attorney General of the United States respecting operations under existing mineral leases, if any there be in lands in controversy, and the payment and impounding of rents and other sums payable thereunder, and respecting the issuance or nonissuance of new mineral leases pending the settlement or adjudication of any controversy, which now exists or may arise, between the United States and the State of California as to whether or not lands are subject to the provisions of said act. With the concurrence of the Attorney General of California, the commission also may enter into and execute agreements respecting the said subjects for, in behalf of, and in the name of the State, with the Secretary of the Interior, who, with the concurrence of the Attorney General of the United States, is authorized by the said act to enter into such agreements in behalf of the United States. With the concurrence of the Attorney General of California, the authority vested in the commission by this section extends to and includes all tidelands and submerged lands, or any interest therein, along the coast of the State of California, whether they be within or beyond the boundaries of the State as established by law, which have been or may be acquired by the State in any of the manners enumerated in Section 6301.

No agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall become effective unless and until it is approved by the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1956, Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.6.

If any funds are impounded pursuant to Section 6301.5 under the custody and control of the State of California, such impounded funds may be invested and reinvested by the Director of Finance in bonds or other obligations of the United States. Such securities may be sold or exchanged by the Director of Finance if, in his opinion, such sale or exchange is in the best interests of the State, and shall be sold by him whenever, and to the extent, necessary to effect any required transfer or other disposition of the impounded funds.

Securities purchased or otherwise acquired under the authority of this section shall be deposited and held in the custody and safekeeping of the State Treasurer, in the name of the account in the fund from which the investments were made. 

Interest earned or other increment derived from investments made pursuant to this section shall, on order of the State Controller, be deposited in the fund from which the investments were made to the credit of the account covering the impounded funds, in augmentation of such impounded funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.7.

The commission may negotiate with, and with the approval of the Governor may enter into agreements with, the United States, or any official, agency, licensee, permittee, or lessee thereof, concerning the effect, if any, of any then existing or proposed or projected fill, dredging, or construction operations or other activities on or adjacent to tide and submerged lands within the County of Los Angeles or Ventura upon the boundary between state-owned submerged lands and the outer continental shelf lands under the jurisdiction of the United States, or concerning the location of that boundary. The agreements may include, but are not limited to, a waiver on behalf of the State of California of any state-owned submerged lands which would otherwise inure to the state as a result of any such fill, dredging, or construction operations, or other activities. The commission shall, before entering into any such agreement, find that the agreement is in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

The commission may eject from any tide and submerged lands, beds of navigable channels, streams, rivers, creeks, lakes, bays, and inlets under its jurisdiction, any person, firm, or corporation, trespassing upon any such lands, through appropriate action in the courts of this state. The commission may recover costs of ejectment through the legal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.1.

(a) (1) The commission may take immediate action, without notice, to remove from areas under its jurisdiction a vessel that is left unattended and is moored, docked, beached, or made fast to land in a position as to obstruct the normal movement of traffic or in a condition as to create a hazard to navigation, other vessels using a waterway, or the property of another.

(2) The commission may take immediate action, without notice, to remove from areas under its jurisdiction a vessel that poses a significant threat to the public health, safety, or welfare or to sensitive habitat, wildlife, or water quality, or that constitutes a public nuisance.

(3) A vessel removed under this section that remains unclaimed for 30 days after notice of removal is abandoned property.

(4) After removal of the vessel pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2), the commission shall mail a notice to the owner, if known, and any known lienholder, that informs the owner and lienholder that if the vessel remains unclaimed for 30 days, it will be deemed abandoned property, and the commission may dispose of it pursuant to Section 6302.3.

(b) (1) The commission may remove from areas under its jurisdiction a vessel that has been placed on state lands without its permission. Prior to removal of the vessel, the commission shall do both of the following:

(A) Give a 30-day notice to remove
 the vessel by attaching it to the vessel in a clearly visible place.

(B) Use reasonable means to identify and locate the owner and any lienholder. If the owner is located, the commission shall mail notice to the owner to remove the property by a date certain at least 15 days from the date of the notice.

(2) If a vessel remains unclaimed after the expiration of the 30 days’ notice period and the 15 days’ owner notice, if applicable, in accordance with paragraph (1), it is abandoned property and the commission may direct the disposition of the property pursuant to Section 6302.3. The commission may also either remove the vessel or allow it to remain in place until the commission takes action to dispose of the property.

(c) Upon request of the owner and after payment of the costs of removal and storage, the commission
 shall return to the owner a vessel removed under this section.

(d) The commission, at its discretion, may remove and dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel on a navigable waterway in the state that is not under the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to this section, if requested to do so by another public entity that has regulatory authority over the area where the vessel is located.

(e) The commission may recover all costs incurred in removal actions undertaken pursuant to this section, including administrative costs and the costs of compliance with the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)),
 through an appropriate action in the courts of this state or by use of any available administrative remedy.

(f) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Appropriate action” means any cause of action available at law or in equity.

(2) “Commission” includes the staff or agents of the commission or other federal, state, or local agencies operating in concert with or under the direction of the commission.

(3) “Unclaimed” means that an owner or a lienholder of the vessel has not contacted the commission in response to a notice made pursuant to this section, if notice is required, and has not made adequate arrangements to take or remove the vessel to an authorized location.

(4) “Vessel” includes any of the following:

(A) A vessel, boat, raft, or similar watercraft.

(B) A buoy, anchor, mooring, or other ground tackle used to secure a vessel, boat, raft, or similar watercraft.

(C) A hulk, derelict, wreck, or parts of a ship, vessel, or other watercraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.2.

(a) The commission shall, in consultation with other relevant state and local agencies directly involved in the removal of abandoned vessels, by July 1, 2019, develop a plan for the removal of abandoned commercial vessels.

(b) The plan required to be developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall prioritize the removal of vessels based on the risk an abandoned commercial vessel presents to the environment of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta and to the health and safety of the public.

(c) The commission shall implement the plan required to be developed pursuant to subdivision (a) upon receipt by the commission of funds appropriated by the Legislature and any federal or private funds
 for this purpose.

(d) For purposes of this section, “Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta” means the lands within the boundaries of the Counties of Contra Costa, Sacramento, San Joaquin, Solano, and Yolo.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   (AB 2441)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.3.

(a) The commission, at a properly noticed commission hearing, may take title to an abandoned vessel subject to disposal pursuant to Section 6302.1 for the sole purpose of abatement, without satisfying any lien on the property, and may cause the property to be sold, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of in any manner it determines is expedient or convenient. Those abandoned vessels shall not be considered surplus state property for the purposes of removal, disposal, or destruction. Title to property transferred by the commission by sale or otherwise to third parties shall be clear of any lien or encumbrance.

(b) Notice of that meeting shall be given to a known owner and known lienholder, and the known
 owner, lienholder, or other interested party shall be given the right to appear and be heard prior to disposition of the property.

(c) A hearing on the disposition of property held pursuant to this section shall be an informal hearing pursuant to Section 11445.20 of the Government Code, unless designated as a formal hearing by the commission.

(d) Any action with regard to the disposition of the property as directed by the commission, with the exception of returning the property to the owner, shall be delayed for 30 days after the date of the commission’s determination, to allow the owner to pursue any other cause of action in law or equity.

(e) The commission’s cost of disposing of abandoned property, including staff time and legal and attorney’s fees, may be recovered by appropriate action in any court in which an
 action may be properly brought or by use of any available administrative remedy. If the property is sold, the commission may recover its costs from any proceeds of the sale and any additional funds received shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 595, Sec. 3.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.4.

(a) At the request of the commission, an employee or agent of the commission or a peace officer of the federal or state government or a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state shall have the authority to board a vessel for the purposes of carrying out Section 6302.1 or 6302.3.

(b) An action of the commission with regard to any property acquired or disposed of pursuant to Section 6302.1 or 6302.3 is exempt from the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 595, Sec. 4.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

(a) The commission may grant the privilege of depositing material upon or removing or extracting material from swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide or submerged lands, beds of navigable streams, channels, rivers, creeks, bays, or inlets owned by the state, for improvement of navigation, reclamation, flood control, or, for purposes connected with the erection or maintenance of structures authorized pursuant to Article 2 (commencing at Section 6321), upon those terms and conditions and for that consideration as will be in the best interests of this state.

(b) When a contractor or permittee has a contract with or a permit from the federal government or any
 authorized public agency to dredge swamp, overflowed, marsh, tide or submerged lands, beds of navigable streams, channels, rivers, creeks, bays, or inlets for the improvement of navigation, reclamation, or flood control, the commission may, if it is in the best interests of the state, allow the contractor or permittee to have sand, gravel, or other spoils dredged from the sovereign lands of the state located within the areas specified in the contract or permit upon those terms and conditions and for such consideration as will be in the best interests of the state, notwithstanding Section 6992 with respect to competitive bidding. The amounts of sand, gravel, or other spoils so removed from sovereign lands shall not exceed those specified in the contract or permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 433, Sec. 3.   (AB 1832)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.1.

Any person who knowingly and willfully fills, dredges, or reclaims any state-owned land under the jurisdiction of the commission underlying any navigable waters, or who erects, maintains, removes, or alters any structure on such land, without written authorization from the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent public agencies from performing emergency alteration, maintenance, repair, or removal of flood control works or structures on state-owned lands underlying navigable waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

The commission may cooperate with the Coastal Engineering Research Board of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, and may expend such moneys as are necessary for cooperative work with that board out of any appropriation made for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 701, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

The powers granted by this chapter to the commission as to leasing or granting of rights or privileges with relation to the lands owned by the state are hereby conferred upon the local trustee of granted public trust lands
 to which those lands have been granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 206, Sec. 3.   (AB 2620)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

(a) For purposes of this division, “local trustee of granted public trust lands” means a county, city, or district, including a water, sanitary, regional park, port, or harbor district, or any other local, political, or corporate subdivision that has been granted, conveyed, or transferred by statute, public trust lands, including tidelands, submerged lands, or the beds of navigable waters, through a legislative grant. A local trustee of granted public trust lands is a trustee of state lands.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, every local trustee of granted public trust lands shall establish and maintain accounting procedures, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles,
 providing accurate records of all revenues received from the trust lands and trust assets and of all expenditures of those revenues. If a trust grantee has several trust grants of adjacent lands and operates the granted lands as a single integrated entity, separation of accounting records for each trust grant is not required.

(c) All revenues received from trust lands and trust assets administered or collected by a local trustee of granted public trust lands shall be expended only for those uses and purposes consistent with the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, and the applicable statutory grant.

(d) All funds received or generated from trust lands or trust assets shall be segregated in separate accounts from nontrust received or generated funds.

(e) (1) Unless otherwise prescribed by an applicable statutory grant, on or before December 31 of each year, each local trustee of granted public trust lands shall file with the commission a detailed statement of all revenues and expenditures relating to its trust lands and trust assets, including obligations incurred but not yet paid, covering the fiscal year preceding submission of the statement.

(2) The statement shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and may take the form of an annual audit prepared by or for the local trustee of granted public trust lands.

(3) (A) The detailed statement shall be submitted along with a standardized
 reporting form developed by the commission.

(B) The commission shall use an existing reporting form previously developed for purposes of this paragraph, if a finding is made by the commission that it is generally responsive to the needs of the commission as prescribed in this section. Alternatively, the commission may develop a reporting form that requires a local trustee of granted public lands to report on all of the following:

(i) A summary of all funds received or generated from trust lands or trust assets.

(ii) A summary of all spending of funds received or generated from trust lands or trust assets.

(iii) Any other disposition of funds received or generated
 from
 trust lands or trust assets or of the trust lands or trust assets themselves.

(iv) A description of the manner in which the statement required by this subdivision and accompanying the reporting form is organized.

(v) Any other information that the commission deems to be included in an accounting of granted public trust lands.

(C) The adoption of the form by the commission pursuant to this subdivision is the prescription of a form for purposes of subdivision (c) of Section 11340.9 of the Government Code.

(4) All forms and supporting statements submitted pursuant to this section shall be public records and be made available on the commission’s
 Internet Web site.

(f) (1) The costs that may be incurred by a local trustee of granted public trust lands that result from any new duties imposed upon that trustee pursuant to Chapter 206 of the Statutes of 2012, including the requirement to submit a standardized reporting form required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), shall be paid from the revenues derived from its granted public trust lands and assets specified in subdivision (b).

(2) If the revenues derived from the granted public trust lands and assets specified in subdivision (b) are not sufficient to pay the costs for the duties specified in paragraph (1), the commission shall exempt the local trustee of granted public trust lands from performing those duties for which the revenues are not sufficient, or
 grant a deadline extension from the performance of those duties until sufficient funds are available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.   (AB 2764)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Lands Commission and the City of Los Angeles, acting by and through its Board of Harbor Commissioners, may take all actions which are necessary for mitigation of expansion of the Port of Los Angeles by the enhancement, restoration, and management of Batiquitos Lagoon in the County of San Diego. Nothing in this section exempts the Batiquitos Lagoon Restoration Project from the regulatory requirements or jurisdiction of any public entity.

If any interests in property are acquired as a part of the Batiquitos Lagoon mitigation project, these interests are to be held in trust for the public as sovereign lands by the State Lands Commission.

The Legislature finds that adequate area for appropriate mitigation of impacts on biological resources does not presently exist within Los Angeles Harbor. The City of Los Angeles, acting by and through its Board of Harbor Commissioners, may expend harbor revenue funds to enhance, restore, and manage Batiquitos Lagoon. The Legislature further finds that the enhancement, restoration, and management of Batiquitos Lagoon will provide benefits to the Port of Los Angeles and the community because it will (1) facilitate the development of an outer harbor landfill which is the initial step in relocating hazardous liquid bulk facilities in the port, thereby providing substantial safety benefits to the surrounding community, (2) allow the port, as part of a larger project, to generate substantial additional revenues to carry out the mandate in the state tidelands grants that the port promote commerce, navigation, and fishery; and (3) create future opportunities for recreational development consistent with tideland grants.

The port shall provide a recreational boating sanitation facility, navigational aids in the Cabrillo Channel, and a free boating safety publication. Provision of these facilities shall be considered by the California Coastal Commission in determining whether the conditions of coastal permit 5-85-623 have been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1415, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to mitigate the effects of the project which is the subject of the Department of the Army Permit No. 14003E48B, issued July 23, 1986, the City of Oakland, acting by and through its Board of Port Commissioners, may use revenue accruing from, or out of, the use of granted tidelands, for the acquisition of land, or an interest in land, located outside the geographical boundaries of the trust grant, or for the enhancement, restoration, or management of land located outside the trust grant, if the commission makes all of the following determinations:

(1) That adequate areas for appropriate mitigation do not presently exist within the geographical boundaries of the port district trust grants, and that if some of the mitigation can occur within the geographical boundaries of the port district trust grants, that mitigation will be included in the mitigation program. 

(2) That the proposed offsite mitigation best promotes appropriate public trust purposes for which sovereign tidelands and submerged lands are held by the state, its location is appropriate in consideration of public trust needs, and it addresses the specific impacts of the project.

(3) That, unless the proposed offsite mitigation is to be located within another tidelands trust grant, title to any land or interest in land acquired, as well as any land which is to be enhanced, restored, or managed, will be transferred to the state, acting by and through the State Lands Commission, to be held in trust for the public as land having the legal character of sovereign lands. 

(4) That the mitigation is in the best interest of the state.

(b) The State Lands Commission may lease any land or interest in land transferred to it pursuant to this section, as provided by Part 2 (commencing with Section 6501).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1415, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6307.

(a) The commission may enter into an exchange, with any person or any private or public entity, of filled or reclaimed tide and submerged lands or beds of navigable waterways, or interests in these lands, that are subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries, for other lands or interests in lands, if the commission finds that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The exchange is for one or more of the purposes listed in subdivision (c).

(2) The lands or interests in lands to be acquired in the exchange will provide a significant benefit to the public trust.

(3) The exchange does not substantially interfere with public rights of navigation and fishing.

(4) The monetary value of the lands or interests in lands received by the trust in exchange is equal to or greater than that of the lands or interests in lands given by the trust in exchange.

(5) The lands or interest in lands given in exchange have been cut off from water access and no longer are in fact tidelands or submerged lands or navigable waterways, by virtue of having been filled or reclaimed, and are relatively useless for public trust purposes.

(6) The exchange is in the best interests of the state.

(b) Pursuant to an exchange agreement, the commission may free the lands or interest in lands given in exchange from the public trust and shall impose the public trust on the lands or interests in lands received in exchange.

(c) An exchange made by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be for one or more of the following purposes, as determined by the commission:

(1) To improve navigation or waterways.

(2) To aid in reclamation or flood control.

(3) To enhance the physical configuration of the shoreline or trust land ownership.

(4) To enhance public access to or along the water.

(5) To enhance waterfront and nearshore development or redevelopment for public trust purposes.

(6) To preserve, enhance, or create wetlands, riparian or littoral habitat, or open space.

(7) To resolve boundary or title disputes.

(d) The commission may release the mineral rights in the lands or interests in lands given in exchange if it obtains the mineral rights in the lands or interests in lands received in exchange.

(e) The grantee of any lands or interests in lands given in exchange may bring a quiet title action under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6461) of Part 1 of Division 6 of this code or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 760.010) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 585, Sec. 3.   Effective October 6, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6307.1.

(a) This section applies only to land in which California has a sovereign interest that lies within the boundaries of the State of Arizona and land in which Arizona has a sovereign interest that lies within the boundaries of the State of California, as a result of changes in the course of the Colorado River, and the redefinition in 1963 of the boundary between the two states.

(b) The commission may enter into land exchange agreements with Arizona to transfer California’s sovereign interest in land located within the boundaries of Arizona and to acquire Arizona’s sovereign interest in land located within the boundaries of California.

(c) The fair market value of the land transferred to Arizona shall be equal to the fair market value of the land acquired from Arizona. This requirement is not mandatory for each separate exchange transaction, but to the extent possible shall be complied with upon completion of all possible exchanges.

(d) The total value of all lands exchanged pursuant to this section shall be determined according to fair market value. Upon completion of all possible exchanges, if there is a difference between the total value of all land transferred to Arizona, and all land acquired by California, the difference shall be eliminated by cash payments from or to the Land Bank Fund established by the Kapiloff Land Bank Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 8600)).

(e) The commission may release the mineral rights in all the land transferred if it receives the mineral rights in all the land acquired.

(f) All land to be acquired by California pursuant to this section shall become, upon acquisition, sovereign land of California subject to the public trust. Any exchange shall be void unless the land to be acquired by Arizona pursuant to the exchange becomes, upon acquisition, sovereign land of Arizona subject to the public trust.

(g) Any land exchange made pursuant to this section shall be subject to the exemption from the California Environmental Quality Act contained in Section 21080.11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 248.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6308.

If an action or proceeding is commenced by or against a county, city, or other political subdivision or agency of the state involving the title to or the boundaries of tidelands or submerged lands that have been or may hereafter be granted to it in trust by the Legislature, the State of California shall be joined as a necessary party defendant in the action or proceeding. Service of summons shall be made upon the Chair of the State Lands Commission and upon the Attorney General, and the Attorney General shall represent the state in all the actions or proceedings. If judgment is given against the state in the action or proceeding, costs shall not be recovered from the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 259.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6309.

(a) The commission shall administer the Shipwreck and Historic Maritime Resources Program, which consists of the activities of the commission pursuant to this section and Sections 6313 and 6314.

(b) The commission has exclusive jurisdiction with respect to salvage operations over and upon all tide and submerged lands of the state. The commission may grant the privilege of conducting salvage operations upon or over those lands by the issuance of permits. The commission may adopt rules and regulations in connection with applications for those permits, and the operations to be conducted in the salvage operation, that the commission determines to be necessary to protect those lands and the uses and purposes reserved to the people of the state.

(c) The commission may issue permits for salvage on granted tide and submerged lands only after consultation with the grantee and a determination by the commission that the proposed salvage operation is not inconsistent with the purposes of the grant.

(d) A salvage permit shall be required of a person or entity to conduct any salvage operation. As used in this section and Section 6313, “salvage operation” means any activity, including search by electronic means, or exploration or excavation using tools or mechanical devices, with the objective of locating, and recovering or removing vessels, aircraft, or any other cultural object from the surface or subsurface of state submerged lands.

(e) Salvage permits shall be issued for one year, with the option to renew the permit for additional one-year periods at the discretion of the commission upon a showing that the permitholder has diligently and lawfully pursued the permitted activity and has achieved to a reasonable extent the purpose for which the permit was issued.

(f) The commission may require that a person designated by the commission and paid by the permitholder be present during each phase of a salvage operation to observe and monitor compliance with the terms of the permit. The permitholder shall, upon the request of the commission, provide or pay for a reliable communication system for the observer to maintain contact with the office of the commission while on the salvage site.

(g) The commission may issue a permit for the search or recovery of nonhistoric vessels, aircraft, or submerged objects, and for the search, archaeological investigation, and recovery of historic vessels, aircraft, or other submerged historic resources as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6313. The commission shall determine the appropriate type of permit to issue based on its evaluation of the salvage project and the project’s probable impact on the site or objective, and the impact on the state submerged lands. The commission shall not require a permit for any recreational diving activity which does not disturb the subsurface or remove objects or materials from a submerged archaeological site or submerged historic resource as defined in Section 6313.

(h) (1) Permits may be revoked by the commission, after notice to the permitholder, at any time the commission finds that the permitholder has failed to comply with the terms of the permit or any law or regulation governing the permitted activity.

(2) A stop work order may be issued by the executive officer of the commission at the request of the onsite observer provided by subdivision (f), if the observer determines that the activities of the permitholder are not within the permitted activity. A stop work order shall be issued after the nonpermitted activity is brought to the attention of the person in charge of the onsite operation and that person fails or refuses after sufficient time and opportunity to change or correct the activity. Written notice of the stop work order shall be given to the person in charge of the onsite activity and a hearing by the executive officer or his or her designee shall be provided to the permitholder within three business days.

(3) After the hearing the commission may seek enforcement of, or the permitholder may seek relief from, the stop work order in the superior court in the county in which the activity is being conducted. The relief may include damages for failure to comply with the stop work order. The commission may deny an application for a permit when it finds that the applicant has failed to provide, for a period of 60 days, information specifically requested by the commission which is necessary to complete the application.

(i) When title to the objects, including a vessel, to be recovered is vested in the state, the commission shall provide for fair compensation to the permitholder in terms of a percentage of the reasonable cash value, or a fair share, of the objects recovered. The reasonable cash value of the objects shall be determined by appraisal by qualified experts selected by the commission. The commission shall determine the amount constituting fair compensation, taking into consideration the circumstances of each case. Title to all objects recovered is retained by the state until it is released by the commission.

(j) The commission may fix and collect reasonable fees and costs for the processing and issuance of permits under this section. The applicant may be required to post a bond to ensure the completion of the project or payment of costs, or to deposit funds with the commission sufficient to cover costs and expenses chargeable to the applicant by law or by an agreement for reimbursement. If a bond is posted, the bond shall be held by the commission and shall be sufficient to cover all potential costs associated with the project, including preserving, restoring, and protecting the site and its associated finds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6310.

Whenever tide and submerged lands granted in trust to a county by the Legislature are included within a city’s boundaries as the result of that city’s incorporation, trust title to such lands shall pass to such city only upon specific authorization and direction of the Legislature and at that time all papers, records, and all other documents pertaining to such lands and the administration thereof shall automatically become the property of the city and shall be transferred to the possession of the appropriate city officials by the county officials having possession thereof; provided, that the city shall pay to the county all costs necessarily incurred in making such transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that any grant of tidelands or submerged lands made after January 1, 1971, within an area which has been designated by the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation as the location of a small craft harbor of refuge, shall contain a reservation and condition requiring the grantee to submit a plan to the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation, within a reasonable period of time after the effective date of the grant, for the construction of facilities necessary or convenient for the use of the granted lands as a small craft harbor of refuge, and requiring the construction of facilities to be completed within a specified period of time after
 approval of the plan by the Division of Boating and Waterways within the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 113, Sec. 9.   (AB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Local trustee” means a local trustee of granted public trust lands that is a county, city, or district, including water, sanitary, regional park, port, or harbor district, or any other local political or corporate subdivision that has been granted public trust lands through a legislative grant. 

(2) “Gross public trust revenues” means those gross revenues that are subject to subdivision (c) of Section 6306. 

(b) Addressing the impacts
 of sea level rise for all of its legislatively granted public trust lands pursuant to this section shall be among the management priorities of a local trustee. The geographic scope of a local trustee’s assessment of the impacts from sea level rise is not required to go beyond the boundaries of the local trustee’s granted public trust lands. 

(c) A local trustee, whose gross public trust revenues average over two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) annually between January 1, 2009, and January 1, 2014, shall prepare and submit to the commission, no later than July 1, 2019, an assessment of how the local trustee proposes to address sea level rise. A local trustee whose gross public trust revenues are two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less may, but is not required to, prepare and
 submit to the commission an assessment. 

(d) For the purposes of subdivision (c), a local trustee shall consider and use relevant information from the 2009 California Climate Adaptation Strategy prepared by the Natural Resources Agency, the Report on Sea Level Rise Preparedness prepared by the State Lands Commission, the Sea-Level Rise for the Coasts of California, Oregon, and Washington: Past, Present, and Future, a report prepared by the National Academy of Sciences, the Resolution of the California Ocean Protection Council on Sea-Level Rise, the State of California Sea-Level Rise Guidance Document, and any subsequent updates to those reports that become available six months prior to the date the
 local trustee submits the assessment to the commission. A local trustee’s assessment prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) shall include all of the following: 

(1) An assessment of the impact of sea level rise on granted public trust lands, as described in the Resolution of the California Ocean Protection Council on Sea-level Rise and the latest version of the State of California Sea-Level Rise Guidance Document. 

(2) Maps showing the areas that may be affected by sea level rise in the years 2030, 2050, and 2100. These maps shall include the potential impacts of 100-year